Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5604XS (2) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2328 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0v. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 283A.6 relating to free school lunch 4 programs in the same manner as a school district. 5 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the 8 requirements of section 283A.6 relating to free school lunch 9 programs in the same manner as a school district. 10 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 283A.6 Free school lunch program. 11 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for 12 each fiscal year thereafter, each school district described 13 in chapter 274, charter school organized under chapter 256E, 14 and charter school or innovation zone school organized under 15 chapter 256F shall operate a program under which lunches are 16 served to students in attendance at no charge to the student 17 or the studentâs family, regardless of family income. Meals 18 served pursuant to this subsection shall be nutritionally 19 adequate meals. 20 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for each 21 fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the general 22 fund of the state to the department of education an amount 23 necessary to make the payments to school districts described 24 in chapter 274, charter schools organized under chapter 256E, 25 and charter schools and innovation zone schools organized under 26 chapter 256F necessary to cover the costs of providing school 27 lunches pursuant to this section that are not covered by any 28 Act of Congress and appropriated to the state of Iowa for use 29 in connection with school lunch programs. 30 3. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant 31 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 32 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 33 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 5604XS (2) 91 mb/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 2328 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to school lunch programs provided by 3 school districts, charter schools, and innovation zone schools 4 (schools). 5 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for each 6 fiscal year thereafter, the bill requires each school to 7 operate a program under which lunches are served to all 8 students in attendance, regardless of the income of the 9 studentâs family. 10 The bill appropriates from the general fund of the state to 11 the department of education an amount necessary to make the 12 payments to schools necessary to cover the costs of providing 13 free school lunches that are not covered by any Act of Congress 14 and appropriated to the state of Iowa for use in connection 15 with school lunch programs. The bill requires the state board 16 of education to adopt rules to administer these provisions. 17 The bill takes effect upon enactment. 18 -2- LSB 5604XS (2) 91 mb/jh 2/ 2